en: Thickener, bodying agent, texturizing agent, thickener synergist, thickening agent, provides body, provides thickness
bg: Сгъстител, сгъстители
ca: Espessidor, espessidors, agent espessidor, agents espessidors, espessant, espessants
cs: Zahušťovadlo, zahušťovadla
da: Fortykningsmiddel, Fortykningsmidler
de: Verdickungsmittel
el: Πυκνωτικό μέσο
es: Espesante, agente de soporte, agente texturizador, agentes texturizadores, aglutinante, sinergista espesante, agente espesante, agentes espesantes
et: Paksendaja, Paksendajad
fi: Sakeuttamisaine, Sakeuttamisainetta, Sakeuttamisaineet, Sakeuttamisaineita
fr: Épaississant, agent de texture, épaississan synergiste, raffermissant, agent épaississant, agents épaississants
ga: Tiúsóir
hr: zgušnjavači, zgušnjivač, zgušnjivači, celuloza zgušnjivači
hu: Sűrítőanyag, sűrítőanyagok
it: Addensante, addensanti, agente addensante, agenti addensanti
ja: 増粘剤
lt: Tirštiklis
lv: Biezinātājs
mk: згуснувач
mt: Aġent li jgħaqqad
nb: Fortykningsmiddel, Fortykningsmidler
nl: Verdikkingsmiddel, Verdikkingsmiddelen
no: fortykningsmiddel
pl: Substancja zagęszczająca, Substancje zagęszczające, zagęszczacz, składnik zagęszczający
pt: Espessante, espessantes
ro: Agent de îngroșare, agenți de îngroșare
ru: Загуститель
sk: Zahusťovadlo
sl: zgoščevalec
sr: zgušnjavači
sv: Förtjockningsmedel, naturlig förtjockningsmedel

en: natural thickener
bg: естествен загъстител
cs: přírodní zahušťovadlo
de: natürliches Verdickungsmittel
el: φυσικό πυκνωτικό μέσο
es: espesante natural
et: looduslik paksendaja
fi: luonnollinen sakeutusaine
fr: épaississant naturel
hr: prirodno zgušnjivač
hu: natúr sűrítőanyag
it: addensante naturale
ja: 天然増粘剤
lt: natūralus tirštiklis
lv: dabīgs biezinātājs
mt: ħasil naturali
nl: natuurlijk verdikkingsmiddel
pl: naturalne substancje zagęszczające, naturalna substancja zagęszczająca, naturalny zagęszczacz
pt: espessante natural
ro: îngroșător natural
ru: натуральный загуститель
sk: prírodné zahusťovadlo
sl: naravno zgoščevalec
sv: naturligt förtjockningsmedel

en: enriching substances, enriching additives, enriching substance
pl: substancje wzbogacające, substancja wzbogacająca

en: Minerals
bg: Минерали
cs: Minerální látky
da: Mineraler
de: Mineralstoffe
el: Ανόργανα συστατικά, Ορυκτά
es: Minerales
et: Mineraalained, Mineraalid
fi: Kivennäisaineet, Kivennäisaineita, Kivennäiset, Kivennäisiä, Kivennäinen, Kivennäistä, Kivennäisaine, Kivennäisainetta, Mineraalit
fr: Minéraux, Substances d'apport minéral, Apport minéral
hr: minerala, Minerali
hu: Ásványi anyagok, ásványok
it: Minerali
ja: ミネラル
lt: Mineralinės medžiagos
lv: Minerālvielas
mt: Minerali
nl: Mineralen
no: Mineraler
pl: Składniki mineralne, minerały
pt: Minerais
ro: Minerale
ru: Минералы
sk: Minerálne látky
sl: Minerali
sv: Mineraler

en: Amino acids, amino acid
bg: Аминокиселини
cs: Aminokyseliny
de: Aminosäuren
el: Αμινοξέα
es: Aminoácidos
et: Aminohapped
fi: Aminohapot, Aminohappoja
fr: Acides aminés
hu: Aminosavak
it: Amminoacidi
ja: アミノ酸
lt: Aminorūgštys
lv: Aminoskābes
mt: Aċidi amminiċi
nl: Aminozuur, Aminozuren
pl: Aminokwasy
pt: Aminoácidos
ro: Aminoacizi
sk: Aminokyseliny
sl: Aminokisline
sv: Aminosyror

en: Nucleotides
bg: Нуклеотиди
cs: Nukleotidy
de: Nukleotide, Nucleotide
el: Νουκλεοτίδια
es: Nucleótidos
et: Nukleotiidid
fi: Nukleotidit, Nukleotidejä
fr: Nucléotides
hu: Nukleotidok
it: Nucleotidi
lt: Nukleotidai
lv: Nukleotīdi
mt: Nukleotidi
nl: Nucleotiden, Nucleotide
pl: Nukleotydy
pt: Nucleótidos
ro: Nucleotide
sk: Nukleotidy
sl: Nukleotidi
sv: Nukleotider

en: Other nutritional substances
de: Andere Nährstoffe
es: Otras sustancias nutricionales
fi: Muut ravinnolliset aineet, Muita ravinnollisia aineita
fr: Autres substances nutritives
hu: Egyéb táplálkozási anyagok, egyéb tápanyagok
it: Altre sostanze nutrizionali, altre sostanze nutritive
ja: その他の栄養物質
ko: 기타 영양 물질
nl: Overige voedingsstoffen
pl: Inne substancje odżywcze
pt: Outras substâncias nutricionais
ru: Другие питательные вещества
sv: Andra näringsämnen
zh: 其他营养物质

en: coagulant, coagulum, coagulating agent, clotting agents
bg: коагулант
ca: Agent coagulant, agents coagulants
de: Koagulationsmittel, Koagulat, Gerinnungsmittel
es: Agente coagulante, agentes coagulantes, agentes cuajantes, coagulante, coagulantes
fi: hyydyte, koagulantti
fr: agent de coagulation, coagulant
hu: koagulálószer, koaguláló, koaguláns
it: agente coagulante, coagulante, agenti coagulanti, coagulanti
ja: 凝固剤

en: salt substitute
ar: بديل الملح
bg: заместител на сол
ca: substitut de la sal
cs: náhražka soli
da: salterstatning
de: Speisesalzersatz, kochsalzersatz
el: υποκατάστατο αλατιού
es: sustituto de la sal
et: soolaasendaja
fi: suolan korvike
fr: substitut du sel
ga: ionadach salainn
he: תחליף מלח
hr: zamjena za sol
hu: Sópótló
id: pengganti garam
is: salt staðgengill
it: sostituto del sale
ja: 塩代替品
ko: 소금 대체품
lt: druskos pakaitalas
lv: sāls aizstājējs
mk: замена за сол
ms: pengganti garam
mt: sostitut tas-melħ
nb: salterstatning
nl: zoutvervanger
pl: substytut soli
pt: substituto do sal
ro: înlocuitor de sare
ru: заменитель соли
sk: náhrada soli
sl: nadomestek soli
sq: zëvendësues i kripës
sr: замена за со
sv: salt substitut
th: สารทดแทนเกลือ
tr: tuz ikamesi
uk: замінник солі
vi: chất thay thế muối
zh: 盐替代品

en: creaming agent
es: agente cremoso
fr: agent de crémage, agent crémeux
it: agente cremoso

en: enhancer
bg: подобрител
es: Potenciador
fi: vahvenne
fr: améliorant, améliorants
hu: javító
it: miglioranti, migliorante, agente migliorante, agenti miglioranti
lv: uzlabotājs
nl: verbeteraar

en: bread improver
bg: подобрител за хляб
de: Backmittel
fr: améliorant de la panification
it: miglioranti per panificazione
ru: улучшитель хлебопекарный

en: cooking enhancer
de: Kochverstärker
es: potenciador de cocina
fr: améliorant de cuisson
it: esaltatore di cottura
ja: 調理エンハンサー
ko: 요리 향상제
pt: intensificador de cozimento
ru: усилитель кулинарии
zh: 烹饪增强剂

fr: additifs alimentaires
hr: aditiv, funkcionalno svojstvo